Washington statutes.
RCW 41.80.140

Office of financial management's labor relations service account—Created.

(1) The office of financial management's labor relations service account is created in the custody of the state treasurer to be used as a revolving fund for the payment of labor relations services required for the negotiation of the collective bargaining agreements entered into under this chapter. An amount not to exceed one-tenth of one percent of the approved allotments of salaries and wages for all bargaining unit positions in the classified service in each of the agencies subject to this chapter, except the institutions of higher education, shall be charged to the operations appropriations of each agency and credited to the office of financial management's labor relations service account as the allotments are approved pursuant to chapter 43.88 RCW. Subject to the above limitations, the amount shall be charged against the allotments pro rata, at a rate to be fixed by the director of financial management from time to time. Payment for services rendered under this chapter shall be made on a quarterly basis to the state treasurer and deposited into the office of financial management's labor relations service account.

(2) Moneys from the office of financial management's labor relations service account shall be disbursed by the state treasurer by warrants on vouchers authorized by the director of financial management or the director's designee. An appropriation is not required.

(3) During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer moneys from the office of financial management's labor relations service account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

[ 2016 sp.s. c 36 s 924; 2002 c 354 s 322.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2016 sp.s. c 36: See note following RCW 18.20.430.